Washington statutes.
RCW 11.102.040

Interpretation of chapter.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

[ 1985 c 30 s 82. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.28.040; prior: 1943 c 55 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 3388-2. Formerly RCW 30.28.040.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.